Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 13 Poultry

21-13-1.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the following words have the meanings ascribed to them in this section:

“Director” means the director of health or his or her duly authorized agent.

“Person” means the state, any municipality, political subdivision, institution, public or private corporation, individual partnership, or other entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-1

; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.

21-13-2.
Registration of persons engaged in slaughtering and evisceration.

All persons engaged in slaughtering and/or eviscerating of poultry for human consumption shall register annually with the director of the department of health during the month of January. Registrations issued will expire on December 31 and must be renewed annually.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-2

; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.

21-13-3.
Premises for slaughtering or evisceration.

All poultry prepared for human consumption in Rhode Island shall be slaughtered and/or eviscerated on premises approved by the director of health.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-3

; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.

21-13-4.
Regulations.

The director of health is authorized to adopt regulations relating to the premises, facilities, materials used, and procedures followed at places where poultry for human consumption is slaughtered, eviscerated, or processed or where poultry products for human consumption are prepared, insofar as the regulations relate to the health and protection of the public.

The director, for the health and protection of the public, is authorized to make ante-mortem inspections of poultry and to quarantine, or segregate, or re-inspect poultry or poultry products at any places where poultry is slaughtered, eviscerated, or processed or poultry products are prepared. The director, for the health and protection of the public, is authorized to condemn and render inedible diseased or unwholesome poultry or poultry products and to retain poultry or poultry products pending their further examination. The director is authorized to adopt regulations dealing with the identification of poultry and the marketing and labeling of poultry products or their containers, essential to the proper administration of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-4

; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 220, § 1.

21-13-5.
Hearing on regulations.

Before establishing the regulations as provided for in §

21-13-4

, the director shall hold a public hearing, notice of which shall be given in a newspaper of statewide circulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-5

.

21-13-6.
Inspection powers.

The director of health or any of the director’s subordinates may enter at reasonable times upon any private or public property for the purposes of inspection and investigating conditions relating to the slaughtering, eviscerating, and processing of poultry or poultry products to be used for human consumption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-6

; P.L. 1970, ch. 220, § 2.

21-13-6.1.
Watering of poultry.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to sell or possess with intent to sell within this state any poultry or poultry product the moisture content of which exceeds the maximum permitted under federal rules or regulations of poultry or poultry products shipped in interstate commerce.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 5, § 2.

21-13-7.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation, which, by itself or its agents or employees, violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation made pursuant to this chapter shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense and not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or less than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each subsequent offense. The superior court shall have jurisdiction in equity to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-7

; P.L. 1970, ch. 220, § 3.

21-13-8.
Revocation or refusal of registration.

Upon determination that any person having a registration issued under this chapter, or who has applied for a registration, has violated or failed to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter, or any of the rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, the director may, after due notice to the registrant, and after affording the registrant an opportunity to be heard, revoke the registration or refuse to issue a registration to an applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-8

.

21-13-9.
Scope of application.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to every person, firm, partnership, or corporation engaged in slaughtering or eviscerating poultry, or in the preparation of poultry products for human consumption.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-9

; P.L. 1970, ch. 220, § 4.

21-13-10.
Responsibility for chapter.

The director of health shall carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3804, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-13-10

; P.L. 1963, ch. 74, § 1.